Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.050

Cessation of membership upon termination of office or employment.

Any member of the commission appointed pursuant to RCW 43.101.030 as an incumbent official or as an employee in a correctional system, as the case may be, shall immediately upon the termination of his or her holding of said office or employment, cease to be a member of the commission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5168; 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 5.]